Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.050

Entry and use of true name.

If he or she alleges that another name is his or her true name it must be entered in the minutes of the court, and the subsequent proceedings on the indictment or information may be had against him or her by that name, referring also to the name by which he or she is indicted or informed against.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1038; 1891 c 28 s 49; Code 1881 s 1065; 1873 p 232 s 227; 1854 p 116 s 91; RRS s 2097.]

NOTES:

Action on discovery of true name: RCW 10.46.060.